Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) No bill or resolution that relates to the health or welfare of children shall be voted
on by a standing committee of either chamber of the General Assembly unless a
children's health and welfare fiscal impact statement has been prepared and
attached to the bill or resolution pursuant to this section.
(2) (a) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall have a children's
health and welfare fiscal impact statement prepared by the Legislative
Research Commission or by other departments or agencies of state
government for any bill or resolution introduced before the General
Assembly that relates to any aspect of children's health or welfare and that
would cause the state or a local government to incur a cost.
(b) Departments or agencies of state government requested by the director to
prepare a children's health and welfare fiscal impact statement under this
subsection shall comply with the request within seven (7) working days of
receipt.
(c) The children's health and welfare fiscal impact statement shall be filed with
the clerk of the chamber of the General Assembly in which the bill or
resolution was introduced and attached to each copy of the bill or
resolution.
(3) The Legislative Research Commission may submit to any other department or
agency of state government, or to any local government, any request for
information concerning fiscal management and fiscal conditions that relate to
child health or welfare. Each recipient shall be required to comply with requests
under this subsection within seven (7) working days.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 911
(4) A children's health and welfare fiscal impact statement shall state whether the
bill or resolution is determined to be a state mandate on local government. This
determination shall be made by the director of the Legislative Research
Commission, except as provided by subsection (5) of this section. If the bill or
resolution is a state mandate on local government, the statement shall contain an
estimate of the effect the law will have on expenditures or revenues of local
government for the first full fiscal year the law is to be in effect.
(5) The director of the Legislative Research Commission, at his or her discretion,
may seek a certification from the Attorney General on the question of whether a
bill or resolution constitutes a state mandate on local government. The Attorney
General shall, within seven (7) working days from receipt of the request, certify to
the director that the bill or resolution is or is not a state mandate.
(6) If any bill or resolution is amended after the preparation of the children's health
and welfare fiscal impact statement, it shall be resubmitted to the person
responsible for preparation of the statement, who shall reevaluate the bill or
resolution as amended and change the statement in accordance with the
amendment.
(7) Copies of the children's health and welfare fiscal impact statement shall be
furnished by the Legislative Research Commission to any school official upon
written request.
(8) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall establish policies and
procedures to ensure the accurate and timely production of children's health and
welfare fiscal impact statements, including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing a system for collecting, compiling, and analyzing fiscal and
other information from the state health and welfare system;
(b) Delegating responsibilities for aspects of the children's health and welfare
fiscal impact statement process to the various staff members of the
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 911
Legislative Research Commission; and
(c) Establishing the format and design of the statements.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed